Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
11-10-717. Collection — Failure to pay or report — Penalty — Definition.

If, after due notice, any employer defaults in any payment of contributions or interest thereon, the amount due may be collected by civil action in the name of the Director of the Division of Workforce Services.

The employer adjudged in default shall pay the costs of the action, including reasonable attorney's fees for prosecution of the action.

Civil actions brought under §§ 11-10-716 — 11-10-723 to collect contributions or interest from an employer shall be heard by the court at the earliest possible date and shall be entitled to preference upon the calendar of the court over all other civil actions except petitions for judicial review under this chapter and cases arising under the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et seq.

The courts of this state shall, in like manner, entertain actions to collect contributions or interest for which liability has accrued under the unemployment compensation law of any other state or of the United States Government.

No suit, including an action for a declaratory judgment, shall be maintained and no writ or process shall be issued by any court of this state that has the purpose or effect of restraining, delaying, or forestalling the collection of any contributions under this chapter or substituting any collection procedure for those prescribed in this chapter. (4) If, after due notice, a person defaults in payment of contributions, the federal income tax refund of the person is subject to interception under the Claims Resolution Act of 2010, Pub. L. No. 111-291, or a regulation adopted to implement that law.

There may be assessed by the director against employers who do not file their reports in the time prescribed by the director a penalty of ten dollars ($10.00) or five percent (5%) of the contributions due on the report, whichever is the greater, if the report is filed within twenty (20) days after its due date.

A penalty of twenty dollars ($20.00) or ten percent (10%) of the contributions due on the report, whichever is the greater, may be assessed on reports filed in excess of twenty (20) days after their due date.

A penalty of thirty dollars ($30.00) or fifteen percent (15%) of the contributions due on the report, whichever is the greater, shall be assessed when:

The employer has failed to supply all information, including, but not limited to, employee wage information, employee Social Security number, and a separate accounting of seasonal worker wages within and without the normal seasonal period of operations, directed by rules prescribed by the director;

The director deems it necessary to estimate wage information;

A subpoena must be used to obtain wage information; or

The employer files a timely quarterly wage report reflecting no wages were paid but then subsequently files an amended quarterly wage report that:

Reflects the required employee information, including without limitation the employee wage information and the employee Social Security number; and

Is filed more than twenty (20) days after its due date.

The courts of this state shall recognize and enforce liability for unemployment contributions, penalties, interest, benefit overpayments, court costs, and reasonable attorney's fees imposed by other states that extend a like comity to this state.

The director is empowered to effect collection of unemployment contributions, penalties, interest, benefit overpayments, court costs, and reasonable attorney's fees due the Division of Workforce Services in any jurisdiction that extends such comity.

In no instance shall this state or any other state exceed the collection procedures as provided by the laws of the state in which collections are effected.

In any case, the director may, as agent for and on behalf of any other state, institute and conduct legal action to collect contributions, penalties, interest, benefit overpayments, court costs, and reasonable attorney's fees under a foreign judgment for states that extend comity to this state.

A certificate by the requesting state attesting the authority of the official to collect contributions, penalties, interest, benefit overpayments, court costs, and reasonable attorney's fees shall be conclusive evidence of the authority.

The requesting state shall pay all court and related costs incurred.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, any employer or any individual, organization, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity engaging, in any way, in contract construction activity and subcontracting out any part of that activity shall be liable for any unpaid contributions, interest, and penalties due from the subcontracting employer to the extent that the contributions, interest, and penalties accrue and are attributable to that part of his, her, or its work subcontracted to the subcontracting employer.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, any employer or any individual, organization, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that meets the definition of “lessor employing unit” as set forth in subdivision (e)(4) of this section shall be liable for contributions on wages paid by the lessor employing unit to individuals performing services for client lessees of the lessor employing unit.

Unless the lessor employing unit has timely complied with the provisions of subdivision (e)(2) of this section, any employer, individual, organization, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity leasing employees from any lessor employing unit shall be jointly and severally liable for any unpaid contributions, interest, and penalties due under this chapter from any lessor employing unit attributable to wages for services performed for the client lessee entity by employees leased to the client lessee entity.

Beginning on or after January 1, 1998, the lessor employer shall keep separate records and submit separate quarterly contribution and wage reports for each of its client lessee entities using the client lessee's account number and unemployment contribution rate.

(a) In order to relieve client lessees from joint and several liability and the separate reporting requirements imposed under subdivision (e)(1) of this section, any lessor employing unit as defined in subdivision (e)(4) of this section may post and maintain a surety bond issued by a corporate surety authorized to do business in Arkansas in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to ensure prompt payment of contributions, interest, and penalties for which the lessor employing unit may be or becomes liable under this chapter.

If after three (3) years, throughout which the lessor employing unit as defined in subdivision (e)(4) of this section has paid all contributions due in a timely manner, the bond shall be reduced to thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) and shall remain at thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) so long as the lessor employing unit continues to report and pay all contributions due in a timely manner.

The employee leasing company is prohibited from moving the wages of a client from one (1) leasing company account to another leasing company account with a lower rate.

In lieu of a surety bond, the lessor employing unit may deposit in a depository designated by the director securities with marketable value equivalent to the amount required for a surety bond. The securities so deposited shall include authorization to the director to sell any such securities in an amount sufficient to pay any contributions which the lessor employing unit fails to promptly pay when due.

Lessor employing units not currently engaged in the business of leasing employees to client lessees shall comply with subdivision (e)(2) of this section before entering into lease agreements with client lessees.

The term “lessor employing unit” is defined as an independently established business entity that engages in the business of providing leased employees to any other employer, individual, organization, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity, referred to herein as a client lessee. Any legal entity determined to be engaged in the business of outsourcing shall be considered a “lessor employing unit” under this section. Additionally, the licensing requirements of the Arkansas Professional Employer Organization Recognition and Licensing Act, § 23-92-401 et seq., as administered by the State Insurance Department must be satisfied.

The provisions of this subsection shall not be applicable to private employment agencies who provide their employees to employers on a temporary help basis, provided that the private employment agencies are liable as employers for the payment of contributions on wages paid to temporary workers so employed.

(b)

For the period beginning on or after January 1, 1998, through June 30, 2005, a bonded lessor employing unit shall report all clients' wages on the lessor employing unit's quarterly contribution and wage report using its contribution rate, account number, and federal identification number.

(c)(1)

Quarterly contribution and wage reports for all clients obtained by bonded lessor employing units on or after July 1, 2005, shall be reported in accordance with subdivision (e)(1)(C) of this section for three (3) consecutive years.

(2)

After reporting client wages for three (3) consecutive years as required by subdivision (e)(2)(A)(i)(

c

)(

1

) of this section, a bonded lessor employing unit shall report client wages on the lessor employing unit's quarterly contribution and wage report using the lessor employing unit's contribution rate, account number, and federal identification number.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 14; 1965, No. 33, § 2; 1975, No. 609, § 11; 1977, No. 376, § 16; 1979, No. 492, § 14; 1979, No. 922, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1117; Acts 1987, No. 753, §§ 20, 21; 1989, No. 420, §§ 13, 14; 1991, No. 100, §§ 46, 47; 1997, No. 234, § 25; 2003, No. 1223, § 13; 2005, No. 902, §§ 12, 13; 2007, No. 490, § 16; 2015, No. 690, § 7; 2019, No. 315, § 834; 2019, No. 455, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§
301, 302.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment added (a)(4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(3)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 455 added (b)(3)(D).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1)(A); and substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (c)(1)(B).

11-10-718. Collection — Priorities under legal dissolutions or distributions — Release of liens.

In the event of any distribution of an employer's assets pursuant to an order of any court under the laws of this state, including any receivership, assignment for benefit of creditors, adjudicated insolvency, composition, or similar proceeding, contributions then or thereafter due shall be paid in full prior to all claims except taxes and claims for wages of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to each claimant, earned within six (6) months of the commencement of the proceedings.

In the event of an employer's adjudication in bankruptcy, judicially confirmed extension proposal, or composition, under the Federal Bankruptcy Reform Act of 1978 contributions then or thereafter due shall be entitled to such priority as is provided in section 507 of that act.

If any person liable for the payment of any tax or contributions due under this chapter neglects or refuses to pay the tax or contribution after a demand, the amount, including any interest, penalty, additional amount, or additions to the tax, together with any costs that may accrue in addition thereto, shall be a lien in favor of the State of Arkansas upon all property and rights to property, whether real or personal, belonging to the person.

The proceedings for enforcing the lien herein provided for shall be brought in the name of the Director of the Division of Workforce Services.

All liens issued under this chapter by the Director of the Division of Labor shall remain in full force and effect and shall be fully enforceable by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services.

Unless another date is specifically fixed by law, the lien shall arise at the time of the notice of the delinquency to the employer and shall continue until the liability of the amount is satisfied or becomes unenforceable by reason of the statute of limitations as fixed in this chapter.

The lien shall not be valid against any mortgagee, pledgee, purchaser, or judgment creditor until the certificate of assessment provided for in § 11-10-720 has been filed with the clerk of the circuit court of the county wherein the employer domiciles or has a place of business, or suit has been filed by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services in a court of competent jurisdiction under § 11-10-717.

If any person, firm, or corporation shall become delinquent in the payment of any contributions, interest, or penalties required to be paid by this chapter and shall transfer title or ownership of the assets of the business, then the delinquent contributions, interest, or penalties shall be collected by means of a levy against the assets as provided in § 11-10-720.

Upon written application by any person, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services or his or her designee may release from a lien any property or part of the property subject to the lien described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section, provided that:

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services or his or her designee determines at any time that the interest of the Division of Workforce Services has no value; or

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services or his or her designee determines that the lien is clouding the title of the property because of an error in the description of properties or similarity in names.

In determining the value of the interest of the division in the property to be released, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services or his or her designee shall give consideration to the value of the property and to the liens thereon having priority over the lien of the division.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 14; 1953, No. 162, § 18; 1985, No. 8, § 27; 1985, No. 9, § 27; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1117; Acts 1987, No. 753, § 22; 1991, No. 100, §§ 48, 49; 2019, No. 910, §§ 303-305.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” throughout the section; substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (b)(1)(B)(ii); substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (c)(1)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” twice in (c)(2).

U.S. Code.

Section 507 of the Federal Bankruptcy Act of 1978, referred to in this section, is codified as 11 U.S.C. § 507.

11-10-719. Collection — Refunds.

If not later than three (3) years after the date of payment of any amount as a contribution, interest, or penalty pursuant to this chapter, any employer who has made such a payment makes application for an adjustment thereof in connection with a subsequent contribution, interest, or penalty payment, or for a refund because the adjustment cannot be made, and the Director of the Division of Workforce Services determines that payment of the contribution, interest, or penalty, or any portion thereof, was erroneous, the director may allow the employer to make an adjustment of the amount erroneously paid, without interest, in connection with subsequent contribution, interest, or penalty payments by the employer.

If the adjustment cannot be made, the director may refund, without interest, from the Unemployment Compensation Fund or from the Division of Workforce Services Special Fund, as applicable, the amount erroneously paid.

However, the director shall not allow any adjustment in connection with subsequent contributions for amounts of interest or penalty payments collected on or after July 1, 1965, nor shall he or she refund any payment from the Unemployment Compensation Fund or any account of the Unemployment Compensation Fund, except that he or she may refund any payment from the interest and penalties collected after that date which are in the clearing account pending transfer to the Division of Workforce Services Special Fund.

Refunds of contributions pursuant to § 11-10-210(f)(6) shall be refunded by the director from the fund without application of the provisions of this section.

For like cause and within the same period, adjustment or refund may be so made on the director's own initiative.

In no event shall a refund or adjustment be granted if the director finds that benefit payments have been based on wages payable or paid that have been reported in error.

The director is further authorized, upon proof being submitted satisfactorily to him or her, to allow transfer of payment of contributions so that the paying source shall receive credit for contributions paid.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 14; 1943, No. 138, § 31; 1965, No. 33, § 2; 1971, No. 35, § 18; 1977, No. 376, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1117; Acts 1997, No. 234, § 26; 2019, No. 910, § 306.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1); and substituted “Division of Workforce Services Special Fund” for “Department of Workforce Services Special Fund” in (a)(2) and (b).

11-10-720. Collection — Certificate of assessment.

If any person, firm, or corporation shall become delinquent in the payment of any contribution, interest, or penalties required to be paid by this chapter, it shall be the duty of the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, when the amount of the contribution, interest, and penalties is determined, either by the report of the employer or by such investigations as the director may have made, to assess the contributions, interest, and penalties so determined against the delinquent employer and to certify the amount of the contributions, interest, and penalties and mail or otherwise deliver a copy of the assessment to the delinquent employer.

At the end of ten (10) days thereafter, the assessment shall become prima facie correct, and the director shall certify the amount of the delinquent contributions, interest, and penalties to the clerk of the circuit court of the county wherein the employer is domiciled or has a place of business, and it shall be the duty of the clerk to file the certificate of record and to enter it in the record of the circuit court for judgment and decree under the procedure prescribed for filing transcripts of judgments by § 16-19-1011.

Thereupon, the assessment shall have the force and effect of a judgment of the circuit court and shall bear interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) a year.

Execution shall be issuable, at the request of the director, his or her agent or attorney, or any other employee of the Division of Workforce Services, forthwith by the clerk of the circuit court, directed to the sheriff, who shall make a levy on any property, assets, or effects of the employer against whom the contribution is assessed.

No exemption shall be allowed to the employer from the levy of an execution issued for contributions, interest, and penalties, and no indemnifying bond shall ever be required by the sheriff before making levy.

If any officer to whom any execution, as provided for in this section, shall be delivered shall neglect or refuse to execute or levy it according to law, or shall take in execution any property, or if any property be delivered to him or her by any person against whom an execution may have been issued, and the officer shall neglect or refuse to make sale of the property so taken or delivered according to law, or if any officer shall not return any execution on or before the return day therein specified, or shall make a false return thereof, then, and in any of the cases aforesaid, the officer shall be liable and bound to pay the whole amount of money in the execution specified, or thereon endorsed and directed to be levied.

It shall be the duty of the clerk of the court from which any execution may be issued to endorse thereon the time when the execution was returned.

An aggrieved employer may have a review of the action of the director in making an assessment for contributions, interest, or penalties, by filing, within ten (10) days after the filing of the assessment with the clerk, a petition for review in the circuit court having jurisdiction.

All actions for review shall have precedence on the docket of the court where filed, and all appeals from the action of any court on the review shall be prosecuted within thirty (30) days after the final order of the court is made.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 14; 1943, No. 138, § 19; 1947, No. 398, § 12; 1977, No. 376, § 16; 1985, No. 8, § 28; 1985, No. 9, § 28; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1117; Acts 1991, No. 100, §§ 50, 51; 2019, No. 910, §§ 307, 308.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1); and substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(3).

11-10-721. Collection — Limitation of assessment.

All contributions due under this chapter shall be assessed in the manner provided by this chapter within four (4) years after reports of the contributions have been filed by the employer, and no proceedings in court shall be begun after the expiration of the period, except as otherwise provided in this section.

In the case of a false or fraudulent return with intent to evade tax or a failure to file reports required by this chapter or by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the tax may be assessed or a proceeding in court for the collection of the tax may be begun at any time.

In case of willful attempt in any manner to defeat or evade tax, the tax may be assessed, or a proceeding in court for the collection of the tax may be begun at any time.

Where the assessment of any contribution required by this chapter has been made within the statutory period of limitation properly applicable thereto, the contribution may be collected by a proceeding in court but only if begun within ten (10) years after the assessment of the contribution except where proceedings are had in court on the assessment within ten (10) years and a judgment of the court is rendered for the contribution. Then the judgment shall have the same force and effect and the limitation shall be the same as other judgments at law under the laws of this state.

The provisions of this chapter shall be applicable in all instances where the limitations set forth in this section have expired under the provisions of this section prior to July 1, 1953.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 14; 1953, No. 162, § 19; 1977, No. 376, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1117; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 309.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (b).

11-10-722. Collection — Impoundment.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services or his or her designated representative may give notice of impoundment of any deposits in any bank or savings and loan institution payable to the order of any employer owing any delinquent contributions, interest, and penalties to which a lien has attached under this chapter. Notice of impoundment shall be served by the director or his or her designated representative by certified mail to the bank or savings and loan institution or by written notice served personally upon its president, vice president, cashier, or assistant cashier.

Any bank or savings and loan institution served with notice of impoundment shall be required to recognize the Division of Workforce Services' lien on any deposit subject thereto by withholding payment of any deposit in an amount not to exceed the amount of the delinquent contributions, interest, and penalty to the depositor or to his or her order for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days.

Any bank or savings and loan institution failing to comply shall be held liable for the amount covered by the notice of impoundment up to the amount on deposit to the employer's credit with the bank or savings and loan institution.

Impoundment of the funds shall be revoked when the lien or judgment has been satisfied and may be revoked at any time at the discretion of the director or his or her designated representative.

Revocation of impoundment shall be served in the same manner as the notice of impoundment.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 14; 1975, No. 609, § 12; 1977, No. 376, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1117; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 52; 2003, No. 1223, § 14; 2019, No. 910, § 310.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a); and substituted “Division of Workforce Services’” for “Department of Workforce Services’” in (b).

11-10-723. Special rules regarding transfers of experience and assignment of rates — Definitions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following shall apply regarding assignment of rates and transfers of experience:

If an employer transfers its trade or business, or a portion thereof, to another employer and, at the time of the transfer, there is any common ownership, management, or control of the two (2) employers, then the unemployment experience attributable to the transferred trade or business, or portion thereof, shall be combined with the employer to whom the business is transferred. The combining of experience and recalculation of applicable employer tax rates shall be made effective the first day of the calendar quarter following the date of transfer of the trade or business, or portion thereof. The transfer of some or all of an employer's workforce to another employer shall be considered a transfer of trade or business, or portion thereof; and

If following a transfer of experience under subdivision (a)(1) of this section or transfer of experience as otherwise provided in this chapter involving only a portion of a trade or business, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services determines that a substantial purpose of the transfer was to obtain a reduced liability for contributions, then the experience rating accounts of the employers involved shall be combined into a single account and a single rate assigned to such an account effective the first day of the calendar quarter following the date of transfer.

Whenever a person is not an employer under this chapter at the time it acquires the trade or business of an employer, the unemployment experience of the acquired business shall not be transferred to that person if the director finds that that person acquired the business solely or primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower rate of contributions. Instead, that person shall be assigned the new employer rate under this chapter. In determining whether the business was acquired solely or primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower rate of contributions, the director shall use objective factors that may include the cost of acquiring the business, whether the person continued the business enterprise of the acquired business, how long that business enterprise was continued, or whether substantial numbers of new employees were hired for performance of duties unrelated to the business activity conducted prior to acquisition.

Knowing violations or attempted violations of subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section or any other provision of this subchapter related to determining the assignment of a contribution rate shall result in an additional two-percent rate increase for the rate year during which the violation or attempted violation occurred and a two-percent additional rate increase in each of the following three (3) rate years. In addition to the rate increases, a penalty of ten percent (10%) of total taxes due shall also be assessed in each of these rate years. All penalty amounts shall be deposited and credited to the Division of Workforce Services Special Fund as set out in § 11-10-716. The additional tax and penalty required by this subsection shall not be credited to the separate account of any employer, nor shall any employer whose contribution rate has been affected by this subsection be eligible to make a voluntary payment pursuant to § 11-10-705(c).

If a person knowingly advises another person in a way that results in a violation of subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section, the person shall be subject to a penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) plus ten percent (10%) of the total taxes due from the person violating subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section for any rate year in which a violation occurred. All penalty amounts shall be deposited and credited to the fund as set out in § 11-10-716.

The rate increases and penalties set forth in this subchapter along with any interest that may accrue as a result of these rate increases and penalties shall be in addition to any other rate increases, penalties, and interest provided in this chapter and shall be subject to collection as provided for in §§ 11-10-716 — 11-10-722.

As used in this section, “knowing” and “knowingly” mean having actual knowledge of or acting with deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard for the prohibition involved.

As used in this section, “violations or attempted violations” and “violates or attempts to violate” include, but are not limited to, intent to evade, misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure.

In addition to the rate increases and penalties imposed by subdivision (c)(1) of this section, any person in violation of this section who knowingly evades or defeats or attempts to evade or defeat the payment of any unemployment insurance tax, penalty, or interest due under this subchapter shall be guilty of a Class C felony.

In addition to the penalties imposed by subdivision (c)(2) of this section, any person who knowingly assists a person in evading or defeating or attempting to evade or defeat the payment of any unemployment insurance tax, penalty, or interest due under this subchapter shall be guilty of a Class C felony.

The director shall establish procedures to identify the transfer or acquisition of a business for purposes of this section.

As used in this section:

“Person” has the meaning given that term by section 7701(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and

“Trade or business” shall include the employer's workforce.

This section shall be interpreted and applied in such a manner as to meet the minimum requirements contained in any guidance or regulations issued by the United States Department of Labor.

If this section and § 11-10-710 could both be applied to a transfer or attempted transfer of experience, this section shall take precedence and be applied to the transfer or attempted transfer.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 902, § 14; 2019, No. 910, §§ 311, 312.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(2); and substituted “Division of Workforce Services Special Fund” for “Department of Workforce Services Special Fund” in (c)(1).

U.S. Code.

Section 7701(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, referred to in (e)(1), is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 7701(a)(1).